North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-12 Mutual Aid Cooperatives

10-12-01.
Mutual aid cooperatives.

Nonprofit cooperatives may be organized for the purpose of effectuating any plan for rural rehabilitation, subsistence farming, or housing, or for the purpose of effectuating any plan or program of any state or federal department or agency or of any other agency or corporation for giving assistance, financial or otherwise, in such endeavors or in cooperative endeavors of any nature or description, or for the purpose of engaging in such endeavors with or without such assistance.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 105, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1201.

Cross-References.

Application of cooperative association law restricted, see N.D.C.C. § 10-15-60.

10-12-02.
Special requirements and powers.

Mutual aid cooperatives are subject to the general law governing cooperatives, but shall also state in their articles the territory to be served by the cooperative, and shall have power to act as the agent or representative of any state, federal, or other agency, corporation, or limited liability company giving assistance to rural rehabilitation, subsistence farming, housing, or cooperative endeavors of any nature. Any cooperative that is hereafter organized under this chapter shall be known as a “mutual aid cooperative” and the word cooperative shall form a part of the name of each cooperative so organized. Any cooperative organized prior to July 1, 1957, and whose name does not include the term “mutual aid cooperative”, may at its option elect to change its name to include “mutual aid cooperative”.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 105, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1202; S.L. 1959, ch. 112, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

10-12-03.
Personal property of rural rehabilitation corporation exempt from taxation — Real property taxable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 595, § 3.

10-12-04.
Industrial commission to receive assets of North Dakota rural rehabilitation corporation upon dissolution.

The industrial commission of North Dakota is hereby designated the agency of the state to receive the assets of the North Dakota rural rehabilitation corporation in the event such corporation is dissolved, including all properties that have been returned or may be returned to the North Dakota rural rehabilitation corporation by the secretary of agriculture upon the application of the corporation pursuant to the provisions of Public Law 499 of the 81st Congress, dated April 3, 1950, including also such assets as have again been transferred or may hereafter be transferred to the secretary of agriculture for administration pursuant to agreement between the North Dakota rural rehabilitation corporation and the secretary of agriculture under the provisions of Public Law 499 of the 81st Congress, dated April 3, 1950. The industrial commission of North Dakota is hereby authorized to enter into any agreement with the secretary of agriculture that may be required with respect to the administration of the assets it so receives.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 105, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1204.

10-12-05.
Application of Act to existing cooperatives. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.